Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 18 Narragansett Indian Land Management Corporation

37-18-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Narragansett Indian Land Management Corporation Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 116, § 1.

37-18-2.
Definitions.

“Corporation” means the Narragansett Indian land management corporation established by §

37-18-3

.

“Federal recognition” means the formal acknowledgement of the existence of an American Indian tribe pursuant to 25 U.S.C. § 1707 and 25 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 83.

“Improvement” means land preparation and provision of public improvements such as streets, sewers, and water lines needed for commercial and residential development.

“Indian” means those descendants of the individuals named on the list established pursuant to the Acts of 1880, ch. 800, § 4.

“Indian corporation” means the Rhode Island non-business corporation known as the Narragansett Tribe of Indians.

“Land use plan” means the plan established by the division of statewide planning and accepted by the town and the corporation.

“Secretary of the interior” means the secretary of the United States department of the interior.

“State” means the state of Rhode Island.

“Town” means the town of Charlestown, Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 116, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 386, § 1.

37-18-3.
Corporation established — Passage to state upon cessation of business.

Subject to the provisions of §

37-18-12

, there is hereby authorized, created, and established a permanent, public corporation of the state having a distinct legal existence from the state and not constituting a department of state government, to be known as the “Narragansett Indian land management corporation” with such powers as are set forth in this chapter for the purposes of acquiring, managing, and purchasing real property as provided in §

37-18-6(d)

.

It is the intent of the general assembly by the passage of this chapter to vest in the corporation all powers, authority, rights, privileges, and titles which may be necessary to enable it to accomplish the purposes herein set forth.

If, for any reason, the corporation shall cease entirely and continuously to conduct or be involved in any business whatsoever in furtherance of its purposes, all its duties, purposes, rights, and properties shall pass to and be vested in the state and the lands shall be held in trust for the Indians, as defined in this chapter, subject to the provisions of §§

37-18-12

and

37-18-13

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 116, § 3; P.L. 1985, ch. 386, § 1.

37-18-4.
Purposes.

The corporation is authorized, created and established for the following purposes:

To manage and hold the real property acquired pursuant to the provisions of §§

37-18-6(d)

and

37-18-7

for the benefit of the descendants of those individuals of Indian ancestry set forth in the list established pursuant to P.L. 1880, ch. 800, § 4.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 116, § 4.

37-18-5.
Board of directors — Annual report — Oath — Officers — Quorum and required vote — Meetings and records.

All the powers of the corporation shall be vested in the board of directors of the corporation. An annual report shall be compiled in accordance with chapter 36 of title 42 and shall also be submitted to the general assembly not later than February 15.

The corporation shall consist of nine (9) directors, five (5) of whom shall be appointed by the Indian corporation, two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the governor (one of whom shall be the director of the department of environmental management or its successor agency or department and who shall serve as nonvoting director and who shall not serve as chairperson), one of whom shall be appointed jointly by the speaker of the house of representatives, and by the president of the senate, and one of whom shall be appointed by the town council. Two (2) of the directors appointed by the Indian corporation and the director appointed by the town council shall be appointed initially to four (4) year terms. Two (2) of the directors appointed by the Indian corporation and the director appointed jointly by the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate shall be appointed initially to five (5) year terms. One of the directors appointed by the Indian corporation and the two (2) directors appointed by the governor shall be appointed initially to six (6) year terms. After the initial appointment terms have expired, successor terms for directors shall be for a period of three (3) years, the intention being that one-third (1/3) of the board of directors shall be appointed annually. Any member chosen to fill a vacancy occurring otherwise than by expiration of a term shall be appointed only for the remainder of that unexpired term. All members of the board shall be eligible for reappointment.

Each member of the board of directors, before entering upon his or her duties, shall take an oath to administer the duties of his or her office faithfully and impartially, and the oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state. No member of the board shall benefit directly or indirectly from any project undertaken by the corporation, other than in his or her capacity as a descendant of an individual listed in P.L. 1880, ch. 800, § 4. The oath shall state:

“I, (naming the person), so solemnly affirm that I will faithfully and impartially discharge my duties as a member of the board of directors of the Narragansett Indian land management corporation according to the best of my abilities, and that I will support the Constitution and laws of this state, and the Constitution of the United States, and I do solemnly promise that I will observe and strictly obey the bylaws, rules, and regulations set down by this commission and do further declare that I entertain no ill will toward any member of this commission. This affirmation I make and give upon the peril of the penalty of perjury.”

The board of directors may elect such officers as may be required to conduct the corporation’s business.

Five (5) members of the board of directors of the corporation shall constitute a quorum, and a vote of five (5) members of the board of directors shall be necessary for any action taken by the corporation. No vacancy in the membership of the board of directors shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the powers and perform the duties of the corporation.

Any action taken by the corporation under the provisions of this chapter may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, and each such resolution shall take effect immediately. All meetings shall be open to the public, and all records shall be a matter of public record except that if a majority of the board by public vote determines that it would be in the best interest of the corporation to hold an executive session in private, then the board is authorized to transact only the following business at the closed meeting, and the records of the meeting shall not become public record until the transaction discussed has, in the opinion of the directors, been completed:

Any discussions of the job performance, character, physical or mental health of a person or persons, provided that the person or persons affected may require that the discussion be held at an open meeting;

Any discussions or consideration related to the acquisition of real property wherein public information would be detrimental to the interest of the corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 116, § 5; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 79.

37-18-6.
Powers and duties.

The corporation shall have the following powers, together with all powers incidental thereto or necessary for the performance of those hereinafter stated:

To have perpetual succession as a body corporate and to adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;

To sue and be sued, complain, and defend, in its corporate name; provided, however, the corporation shall have no standing in any zoning or other administrative or judicial proceeding involving land presently owned by castle realty company in the town;

To have a seal which may be altered at pleasure and to use the seal by causing it, or a facsimile thereof, to be impressed or affixed or in any other manner reproduced;

To purchase, take, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire from any person, firm, corporation, municipality, the federal government, or state, by grant, purchase, lease, or gift, or to obtain options for the acquisition of any personal property and the real property situated in the town and defined as the “settlement lands” in that “joint memorandum of understanding concerning settlement of the Rhode Island Indian land claims” dated February 28, 1978, and related to the lawsuits entitled Narragansett Tribe of Indians v. Rhode Island Director of Environmental Management, and Narragansett Tribe of Indians v. Southern Rhode Island Land Development Co., et al., C. A. Nos. 75-0005, 75-0006 (U.S. D. R.I.), improved or unimproved, and interests in the land less than the fee thereof; and to own, hold, clear, improve, develop, and rehabilitate the land subject to the restrictions set forth in §§

37-18-7

and

37-18-10

;

To make and execute agreements of lease, mortgages, construction contracts, operation contracts, and other contracts and instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the corporation granted by this chapter; provided, however, that any liabilities incurred shall be payable solely from the revenues of the corporation;

To invest and reinvest its funds;

To conduct its activities, carry on its operations, and have offices and exercise the powers granted by this chapter within the state;

To elect or appoint officers and agents of the corporation, define their duties, and fix their compensation;

To secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States and any of its agencies and of agencies of this state in the work of the corporation;

To accept grants, donations, gifts, loans of funds, and contributions of money, services, materials, or otherwise, from the United States or any of its agencies, from the state or any of its agencies, or from any other source, and to use or expend money, services, materials, or other contributions in carrying out the purpose of this chapter;

To enter into agreements to pay annual sums in lieu of taxes to the town in respect to real property which is owned by the corporation and is located in the town;

To employ, in its discretion, attorneys, accountants, architectural and engineering consultants, financial consultants, and such other employees, except an executive director, and agents as it shall deem necessary in its judgment and to fix their compensation;

To grant or otherwise convey (whether voluntarily or involuntarily, including any eminent domain or condemnation proceedings) easements for public or private purposes;

The corporation shall have the power to and shall grant to the Providence boys’ club or its successors in interest a reasonable right of way over the real property held by the corporation if any real property held by the Providence boys’ club or its successors in interest requires such a right of way as a means of access to a public right of way;

The corporation shall have the power to and shall grant to the state a mutually acceptable right and easement to pass by foot and vehicle over a forty-five foot (45´) wide strip of land located within the town and in the Indian Cedar Swamp management area between Kings Factory road and the Pawcatuck River, and to use an area of the end of the strip sufficiently large for the parking of automobiles and the launching of boats;

To adopt rules and regulations concerning hunting and fishing rights on the corporation’s land subject to the provisions of §

37-18-8

;

To bring proceedings to remove clouds on title or such other proceedings as it may, in its discretion, deem proper and necessary;

To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect its purposes; provided, however, the corporation shall have no power to sell, grant, convey, transfer, or otherwise alienate land or any interest therein other than as specifically provided in subsection (m) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 116, § 6.

37-18-7.
Transfer of property — Restrictions on use.

Subject to the provisions of §§

37-18-12

,

37-18-13

, and

37-18-14

, upon the adoption of a land use plan accepted by the town and the corporation pursuant to §

37-18-10

and the satisfaction of the requirements set forth in §

37-18-8

, the governor is authorized, empowered, and directed to transfer, assign, and convey to the corporation in fee simple all the right, title, and interest of the state in and to the following approximately nine hundred (900) acres of real estate located in the town;

The Indian Cedar Swamp management area;

Indian Burial Hill; and

The state land around Deep Pond.

Provided, however, that the state shall retain control of and public access shall be guaranteed to an adequate fishing area within the state land around Deep Pond, and provided, further, that the governor is only authorized, empowered, and directed to transfer, assign, and convey to the corporation the real estate which is located around Deep Pond upon the governor’s making a finding that the required and appropriate federal approval of the transfer has been obtained so that the transfer will not affect, in any adverse manner, any benefits received by the state under the Pittman Robertson Act, 16 U.S.C. § 669 et seq. and the Dingell Johnson Act, 16 U.S.C. § 777 et seq.

Upon the same findings and determinations outlined above, the governor is authorized, empowered, and directed to transfer, assign, and convey to the corporation and its assigns a mutually acceptable exclusive (except as to lateral crossing) right and easement to pass by foot and vehicle over a forty-five foot (45´) wide strip of state land located within the town between Kings Factory Road and Watchaug Pond, and to use an area at the end of the strip sufficiently large for the parking of automobiles and the launching of boats.

The authority herein granted to the governor shall be in addition to any other authority conferred upon him or her by law. The real estate conveyed by the state to the corporation pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be held in perpetuity for conservation purposes and shall not be improved or developed by the corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 116, § 7; P.L. 1985, ch. 386, § 1.

37-18-8.
Hunting, fishing, and trapping.

The corporation shall have the right to make rules and regulations regarding fish and game conservation on real estate held by the corporation; provided, however, that the corporation shall not issue those rules and regulations until it has consulted with the director of environmental management, and further provided that the corporation shall impose minimum standards for safety of persons and protection of wildlife and fish stock.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 116, § 8.

37-18-9.
Exemption from taxation — Payments in lieu of taxes.

The corporation shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon or in respect to any property of the corporation levied by the town.

The corporation shall make payments in lieu of real property taxes and assessments to the town with respect to income producing projects of the corporation located in the town, and for police, fire, sanitation, health protection, and municipal services provided by the town to the real estate held by the corporation in the town. The payments in lieu of taxes shall be in such amounts as shall be agreed upon by the corporation and the town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 116, § 9.

37-18-10.
Land use plan.

All real property owned and held by the corporation shall be subject to a land use plan prepared by the office of state planning within the department of administration. No less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the land owned by the corporation, exclusive of the real property described in §

37-18-7

, shall not be improved and developed and shall be held in perpetuity for conservation purposes, and the real property to be held in perpetuity for conservation purposes shall be delineated in the land use plan. The land use plan shall be mutually acceptable to the corporation and the town. Acceptance by the town of the plan shall not be unreasonably withheld. Upon acceptance of the plan by the town, the town shall amend its zoning ordinance adopted pursuant to chapter 24 of title 45 so as to conform to the plan. The zoning ordinance as amended shall govern the land use of real property owned by the corporation and the ordinance shall not be further amended in a manner inconsistent with the plan without the consent of the corporation; provided, however, that the ordinance shall not be amended in any manner affecting the land designated in the land use plan for conservation purposes.

The corporation shall not be entitled to use any portion of the real property to be owned and held by the corporation until such time as the land use plan is adopted by the corporation and accepted by the town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 116, § 10.

37-18-11.
Civil and criminal jurisdiction.

Except as otherwise provided, the corporation and all its authorized activities shall be subject to all the criminal and civil laws of the state and the town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 116, § 11.

37-18-12.
Expiration of the corporation.

Upon presentation of evidence to the Narragansett Indian land management corporation and the Rhode Island secretary of state that the Indian corporation known as the Narragansett Tribe of Indians has applied for and been granted by the United States government pursuant to 25 U.S.C. § 1707 and 25 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 83, federal recognition as an Indian tribe with inherent rights, powers, and responsibilities possessed by Indian tribes in the United States, the Narragansett Indian land management corporation shall expire thirty (30) days after the presentation of the evidence. Prior to its expiration, the corporation shall prepare and submit to the general assembly a final report of its termination activities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 116, § 12; P.L. 1985, ch. 386, § 1.

37-18-13.
Transfer of land to Indian tribe.

Upon the presentation of federal recognition to the Narragansett Indian land management corporation and the secretary of state, the Narragansett Indian land management corporation shall forthwith transfer and convey to the federally recognized Narragansett Tribe of Indians all powers, authority, rights, privileges, titles, and interest it may possess to any and all real property acquired, owned, and held for the benefit of those individuals of Indian ancestry set forth in the list established pursuant to P.L. 1880 ch. 800, § 4, and thereafter, the Narragansett Indian land management corporation shall have no further interest in the real property. All real property transferred by the Narragansett Indian land management corporation to the federally recognized Narragansett Tribe of Indians pursuant to this provision:

Shall be subject to the same conditions, restrictions, limitations, or responsibilities set forth in §§

37-18-6(m)(2)

and (m)(3),

37-18-8

,

37-18-9

,

37-18-10

, and

37-18-11

hereof as are applicable to the corporation and all its authorized activities.

Shall be subject to the civil and criminal laws of the state of Rhode Island and the town of Charlestown, Rhode Island, except as otherwise provided herein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 386, § 2.

37-18-14.
Transfer of state land to the Indian tribes.

Upon presentation of federal recognition to the Narragansett Indian land management corporation and the secretary of state, the governor is authorized, empowered, and directed to transfer, assign, and convey to the Narragansett Tribe of Indians in fee simple all the right, title, and interest of the state in and to the following approximately nine hundred (900) acres of real estate located in the town;

The Indian Cedar Swamp management area;

Indian Burial Hill; and

The state land around Deep Pond.

Provided, however, that the state shall retain control of and public access shall be guaranteed to an adequate fishing area within the said state land around Deep Pond, and provided, further, that the governor is only authorized, empowered, and directed to transfer, assign, and convey to the Narragansett Tribe of Indians the real estate which is located around Deep Pond upon the governor’s making a finding that the required and appropriate federal approval of the transfer has been obtained so that the transfer will not affect, in any adverse manner, any benefits received by the state under the Pittman Robertson Act, 16 U.S.C. § 669 et seq. and the Dingell Johnson Act, 16 U.S.C. § 777 et seq.

Upon the same findings and determinations outlined above, the governor is authorized, empowered, and directed to transfer, assign, and convey to the Narragansett Tribe of Indians and its assigns a mutually acceptable exclusive (except as to lateral crossing) right and easement to pass by foot and vehicle over a forty-five foot (45´) wide strip of state land located within the town between Kings Factory Road and Watchaug Pond, and to use an area at the end of the strip sufficiently large for the parking of automobiles and the launching of boats.

The authority herein granted to the governor shall be in addition to any other authority conferred upon him or her by law. The real estate conveyed by the state to the Narragansett Tribe of Indians pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be subject to the civil and criminal laws of the state of Rhode Island and the town of Charlestown, Rhode Island, except as otherwise provided herein, and shall be held in perpetuity for conservation purposes and shall not be improved or developed by the Narragansett Tribe of Indians.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 386, § 2.

37-18-15.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 386, § 2.